Louisiana, session 2026, HB1233.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:2225.2.4(A)(3) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§2225.2.4. Construction management at risk; public entity
A.
* * *
(3) CMAR shall not be used for any project that is estimated to cost less than
five million dollars, exclusive of a hospital service district as defined by R.S.
46:1072(2)(a) that may not use CMAR for any project estimated to cost less than two
one million dollars. At least sixty days prior to proceeding to use CMAR for any
project that is estimated to cost less than fifteen million dollars, a public entity shall
deliver written notification of the proposed CMAR project by name and description
of the project, together with the reason to use CMAR, to the House and Senate
transportation, highways, and public works committees for review and approval.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.